Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB299.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Significant Holiday Designation Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Charter Day commemorates when William Penn received the Charter Contract of Pennsylvania from Britain's King Charles II in 1681. Charter Day allows all Pennsylvanians, and people the world over, to reflect on Penn's "Holy Experiment" in government, one operating on principles of justice, liberty, freedom, tolerance and respect for all.(2) Flag Day commemorates the adoption of the flag of the United States on June 14, 1777, by resolution of the 123456789101112131415161718 Second Continental Congress.(3) Constitution Day commemorates the September 17, 1787, signing of the Constitution of the United States, the most important of our nation's founding documents.Section 3. Designations.(a) Charter Day.--March 4 shall be designated as Charter Day in this Commonwealth.(b) Flag Day.--June 14 shall be designated as Flag Day in this Commonwealth.(c) Constitution Day.--September 17 shall be designated as Constitution Day in this Commonwealth.Section 4. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat a day designated under this act as a legal or official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on a day designated under this act solely by virtue of the date being designated under this act.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0299PN0243 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819